Arkansas, session 2025, HB1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-301-306 is amended to read as follows:
14-301-306. Ownership of street or alley vesting in abutting owners —
Pending suits unaffected.
(a)(1) Upon the adoption of the ordinance, the absolute ownership of
the property abandoned by the city or town shall vest in the owners of the
real estate abutting thereon.
(2) Each such abutting owner shall take title to the center line
of the street or alley so abandoned, and the ownership shall be free from the
easement of the city or town for public use as a street or alley.
(b)(1) A future conveyance of real estate abutting a street or alley
abandoned by a city or town includes the respective portion of the street or
alley abandoned by the city or town that vested in the abutting owner upon
adoption of the ordinance unless an express reservation is made by the
abutting owner.
*SSS046*
03-04-2025 10:31:06 SSS046

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1272
(2)(A) If real estate abutting the street or alley abandoned by
a city or town is platted, the plats of the abutting real estate are amended
to add the respective portions of the street or alley abandoned by the city
or town to the abutting real estate.
(B) A conveyance of the abutting real estate without
reference to the street or alley abandoned by the city or town includes the
respective portion of the street or alley abandoned by the city or town that
vested in the abutting owner upon adoption of the ordinance.
(b) (c) This subchapter shall not affect suits now pending in any of
the courts of this state.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Retroactivity.
This act applies retroactively to all the streets and alleys abandoned
by a city or town with real estate abutting the streets and alleys after
February 6, 1945.

/s/Warren



















03-04-2025 10:31:06 SSS046